District of Columbia statutes.
29A-1073

Repealed

Transaction of business outside the state.

Repealed.

July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-138, § 74, 41 DCR 3010
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(s), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-1073.
1981 Ed., § 29-1373.